Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5891.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 11c. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 29 to 167 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29.559(c) Pub saf G Hazardous products act â third or subsequent violation 2 35.929 Pub trst H Willful falsification in application for veterans benefits 3 35.980 Pub trst H False statement in application for Korean veterans benefits 3 35.1029 Pub trst H False statement in application for Vietnam veterans benefits 3 38.412a(1) Pub trst H County employee providing answers to county civil service exam 1 38.516 Pub trst H Fire and police civil service â appointment or employment contrary to act 2 45.82 Pub trst E County purchasing agent â violations in awarding bids or contracts 5 47.8 Pub trst H Payment of claim against county before audit 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 47.56 Pub trst H Wayne county treasurer paying claims without appropriate signature 2 51.364 Pub trst H Appointment or selection contrary to civil service commission rules 2 55.301(4) Pub trst E Performing notarial acts while commission revoked 5 55.309(1)(b) Pub trst F Michigan notary public act violation involving conveyance of interest in real property 4 110.28 Pub trst G Fourth class cities â misappropriation of money or property 3 117.25(3)117.25(2) Pub trst E Amendment to city electors â willfully affixing another's signature, false representation 15 125.1447(1)(c) Property E False pretenses under state housing development act involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 125.1447(1)(d) Property D False pretenses under state housing development authority act involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00841'25) or House Bill No. 5890 (request no. H00841'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.